Wisconsin, session 2025, AB61.
do enact as follows:AB61,11Section 1. 951.18 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB61,2,122951.18 (2m) Any person who violates s. 951.095 is subject to a Class B 3forfeiture. Any person who intentionally or negligently violates s. 951.095, knowing 4that the animal that is the victim is used by a law enforcement agency or fire 5department to perform agency or department functions or duties, is guilty of a 6Class A misdemeanor. Any person who intentionally violates s. 951.095, knowing 7that the animal that is the victim is used by a law enforcement agency or fire 8department to perform agency or department functions or duties and causing 9injury to the animal, is guilty of a Class I H felony. Any person who intentionally 10violates s. 951.095, knowing that the animal that is the victim is used by a law 11enforcement agency or fire department to perform agency or department functions 12or duties and causing death to the animal, is guilty of a Class H G felony.AB61,2,1313